Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1604
Employees eligible.

The coverages provided for by sections 84-1601 to 84-1615 shall be afforded to each permanent state employee who works one-half or more of the regularly scheduled hours during each pay period, commencing after thirty days of such employment, and to each temporary employee only as described in subsection (2) of section 84-1601, commencing after thirty days of such employment. Permanent and temporary employees who are employed less than the regularly scheduled hours as defined for a permanent employee shall be entitled to state contributions on a proportionately reduced basis. The life and health insurance coverages provided by sections 84-1601 to 84-1615 shall be totally independent of one another and the loss experience and the rates for the two coverages shall be maintained separate and apart from one another.

Laws 1973, LB 516, § 8;

Laws 1974, LB 789, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 391, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 80;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 50;

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-1627;

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 86.